Nebraska, session 109, LB657.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB657 LB657
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Athletic contest means any interscholastic, intercollegiate, or
any other organized amateur or professional athletic contest; and
(b) Sports official means any individual who:
(i) Serves as a referee, umpire, or linesman or who serves in a
similar capacity but is known by a different title or name; and
(ii) Is duly registered by, or a member of, a local, state,
regional, or national organization engaged in part in providing education
and training to sports officials.
(2) A person commits the offense of assault on a sports official if
such person:
(a) Intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to a sports
official;
(b) Such offense is committed immediately prior to, during, or
immediately following an athletic contest in which the sports official is
participating; and
(c) The person who commits the offense knows or reasonably should
know that the victim is a sports official.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-